Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2817
Dispense or dispensing, defined.

(1) Dispense or dispensing means interpreting, evaluating, and implementing a medical order, including preparing and delivering a drug or device to a patient or caregiver in a suitable container appropriately labeled for subsequent administration to, or use by, a patient.

(2) Dispensing includes (a) dispensing incident to practice, (b) dispensing pursuant to a delegated dispensing permit, (c) dispensing pursuant to a medical order, and (d) any transfer of a prescription drug or device to a patient or caregiver other than by administering.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 913.